Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2520.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Lay midwife." A traditional midwife, direct-entry midwife, birth worker or other similar individual who provides support to 12345678910111213141516171819202122 a pregnant individual before, during and after birth but who is not licensed as a midwife by the board.* * *Section 2. Section 12 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 12. Midwifery.* * *(d) Unlawful conduct.--In addition to the conduct that constitutes unlawful conduct under section 38, it shall be unlawful conduct for an individual who is not licensed under this act to:(1) Represent or hold out that the individual is a licensed midwife.(2) Administer a prescription medication in the practice of lay midwifery.(3) Before engaging in lay midwifery with a client, fail to obtain from the client an informed consent statement that includes the following:(i) A description of the individual's midwifery education, training, continuing education and experience.(ii) A statement that the individual is not licensed by the State as a midwife.(iii) A statement that it is unlawful for the individual to administer to the client a prescription medication in the practice of lay midwifery.(iv) A written plan to address:(A) Medical issues that the client may experience during pregnancy, labor or childbirth.(B) The transfer of the client to a licensed health care provider or facility, if necessary.20260HB2520PN3408 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The name and signature of the individual.(vi) The name and signature of the client.(vii) The date that the individual signed the statement.(viii) The date that the client signed the statement.(4) Fail to retain for at least four years a signed statement from a client described under paragraph (3).(e) Effect of nonlicensed status.--Except for conduct that constitutes unlawful conduct under subsection (d), a lay midwife who does not hold a license under this act shall not be considered licensed or regulated by the Commonwealth.(f) Construction.--Subsection (d)(3) and (4) shall not be construed to compel a person to provide a patient with an informed consent form if the person or patient is a member of a recognized religious sect or division and is an adherent of established tenets or teachings of the sect or division, by which the person or patient is conscientiously opposed to modern medical practice and licensure.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2520PN3408 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920